Washington statutes.
RCW 39.10.250

Project review committee—Duties.

The committee shall:

(1) Certify, or renew certification for, public bodies to use design-build or general contractor/construction manager contracting procedures, or both;

(2) Review and approve the use of the design-build or general contractor/construction manager contracting procedures on a project by project basis for public bodies that are not certified under RCW 39.10.270;

(3) Review and approve the use of alternative subcontractor selection under RCW 39.10.385 on a project-by-project basis for public bodies that are not certified under RCW 39.10.270, which review and approval may be concurrent with project approval; and

(4) Review and approve not more than two design-build demonstration projects that include procurement of operations and maintenance services for a period longer than three years.

[ 2021 c 230 s 5; 2019 c 212 s 2; 2013 c 222 s 5; 2009 c 75 s 2; 2007 c 494 s 105.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.

Effective date—2021 c 230: See note following RCW 39.10.210.

Effective date—2013 c 222: See note following RCW 39.10.210.